Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-10,123
Class I school district; schoolhouse; site; facilities; tax; contract; surplus funds.

The provisions of sections 23-504 to 23-507 which relate to special funds for erection of courthouses shall apply so far as practicable to the procedure under sections 79-10,122 to 79-10,125. The school board or district trustees have power to contract for the erection or repair of the building under the same restrictions as the county board in case of the erection of a courthouse, and any residue of such tax shall be credited to the school district general fund.

Laws 1951, c. 275, § 2, p. 926;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-506.02;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 50;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 57;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-608;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 769.